South Dakota, session 2026, HB1119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 58-35-8 be AMENDED:
58-35-8. The articles of incorporation required by § 58-35-7 must state:
(1) The name of the corporation, which must include the words "farm mutual" and, if
a county mutual insurer, the name of the county of its principal place of business;
(2) If a county mutual insurer, the name of the counties in which the corporation
intends to do business and the address of its principal business office;
(3) If a state mutual insurer, the location of its principal business office, which must
be located in this state;
(4) The purposes for which the corporation is formed;
(5) Whether the corporation will transact business on a cash premium plan or an
assessment plan;
(6) The duration of the corporation's existence, which may be perpetual;
(7) The number of the corporation's directors, which may not be less than five nor
more than fifteen, and the names and addresses of the persons constituting the
initial board of directors who shall serve until the first annual meeting of the
members, and until their successors are elected and qualified; and
(8) The names, residences, and addresses of the incorporators and the value of their
property desired to be insured.
Section 2. That § 58-35-26 be AMENDED:
58-35-26. No individual may serve as a director of a farm mutual insurer unless
the individual is a member of the insurer or a member of one or more of the insurer’s
affiliates.

26.413.10 2 1119
For the purposes of this section, “affiliate” means any entity that directly, or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with, the insurer at issue.
HB1119 ENROLLED

26.413.10 3 1119
An Act to modify provisions regarding directors serving on a farm mutual insurer’s board.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1119
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1119 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1119 ENROLLED